North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-09 Aid to Dependent Children
50-09-40.
Report of gambling winnings.

Before a gaming operator makes a payment of winnings for which the gaming operator is required to file an internal revenue service form W-2G or substantially equivalent form, the gaming operator shall obtain the name, address, and social security number of the winner and submit the information to the state agency through a secure interactive website that is maintained by the state agency. If the state agency replies to the gaming operator that the winner does not owe past-due support or if the gaming operator is unable to receive information from the state agency after attempting in good faith to do so, the gaming operator may make the payment to the winner. If the state agency replies that the winner owes past-due support, the reply must include the amount of past-due support owed by the winner and the location of the office with which the winner may file a protest under section 50-09-14. The gaming operator shall withhold from the payment to the winner an amount equal to the total winnings or the amount of past-due support, whichever is less. Within seven business days after withholding the payment, the gaming operator shall send the amount withheld to the state disbursement unit, along with the name, address, and social security number of the winner. The gaming operator may withhold and retain an additional sum of three dollars from the winner to cover expenses involved in sending the payment. A gaming operator that withholds funds under this section is subject to the same duties and liabilities as an income payer under section 14-09-09.3 unless the context indicates otherwise and is immune from suit or liability for complying with this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 419, § 15.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective July 1, 2010.